Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is established within the office of the Governor  the Office of Im-
migrant and Refugee  Advancement for the purpose of operating a statewide immigrant and
refugee integration strategy.
(2) The Office of Immigrant and Refugee Advancement is under the supervision  and
control of a director, who is responsible for the  performance of the duties, functions and
powers of the office. The director shall be chosen through an open hiring process. In addi-
tion to the director, the office shall include at least the following full-time staff members:
(a) One staff member who focuses on community partnerships;
(b) One staff member who focuses on data collection and research; and
(c) One staff member who focuses on administrative support for the office.
(3) The office shall:
(a) Advocate for and partner with statewide immigrant  and refugee programs and ser-
vices that coordinate with long-term support services to meet the needs of  immigrant and
refugee populations in this state;
(b) Collect data on immigrant and refugee populations in this state for the purposes  of
determining the needs of the populations and tracking progress in  reducing social, economic
and health disparities for the populations;
(c) Monitor  and protect data collected under this subsection and ensure that any data
collected and maintained by the office is not disclosed to any person or entity  not affiliated
with the office;
(d) Track state legislation that impacts immigrant and refugee populations in this state;
(e) Ensure  that any racial and ethnic impact statements for legislation accurately include
the impact to immigrants and refugees in this state who are individuals who  are Black,
indigenous or other people of color;
(f) Advocate for resources from the federal government to support the immigrant  and
refugee populations;
(g) Monitor and, unless  prohibited by federal or state law or rule, publish any invest-
ments made by the state for the  benefit and support of the immigrant and refugee popu-
lations;
Enrolled Senate Bill 778 (SB 778-A) Page 1
(h) Partner with other state agencies as needed to meet the objectives of the office;
(i) Partner with community-based organizations as needed to meet the objectives of  the
office; and
(j) Adopt rules as necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Office of Immigrant and Refugee  Advancement,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,376,037
for the purposes of employing the director and full-time staff members described in  section
1 of this 2021 Act and carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 1 of this 2021 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Governor may take  any action before the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this section that is necessary to enable the Governor to  exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of  the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the Governor by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 778 (SB 778-A) Page 2